Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 49

Management Of Assets

Preambles. Acts 1961, No. 424, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, due to the changed nature of the economy of Arkansas, it is no longer true that real property constitutes the sound core of the assets of most estates; and in many instances the estate of a decedent now includes investments represented by personal property more desirable than certain types of real property to be preserved for distribution to the heirs at law or beneficiaries of the will of the decedent; and by the provisions of the Probate Code it was the intention of the General Assembly of Arkansas of 1949 to give suitable recognition to this change; but it now appears that apparently conflicting provisions in that Code have given rise to ambiguity and uncertainty of interpretation thereof;

“Now, therefore….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1951, No. 255, § 15: Mar. 19, 1951. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly has ascertained that there is a likelihood of misconstruction of certain provisions of the Probate Code, and that an urgent need exists for clarification thereof and certain additions thereto in order that the law relating to proceedings in probate may be construed and administered in a uniform manner throughout the State, in accordance with the legislative intent; for the accomplishment of which purposes this Act is adopted. An emergency is therefore declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, welfare and safety, shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

28-49-101. Possession by personal representative.

A personal representative shall have the right to, and shall, take possession of all of the personal property of the estate of the decedent, subject to the rights of dower and curtesy and statutory allowances of the surviving spouse or minor children, if any.

Real property shall be an asset in the hands of the personal representative when so directed by the will, if any, or when the court finds that the real property should be sold, mortgaged, leased, or exchanged for any purpose enumerated in § 28-51-103, irrespective of whether any personal property of the estate, other than money, is available for such a purpose.

When real property has become an asset in the hands of the personal representative as provided in this section or when and as long as the court finds it necessary for the preservation of the property, for protecting the rights and interests of persons having interests therein, or for the benefit of the estate, the personal representative may collect rents and earnings from the property, pay taxes and special assessments thereon, make necessary repairs thereon, maintain the property in tenantable condition, preserve it against deterioration, protect it by insurance, and maintain or defend an action for the possession of the property, or to determine or protect the title until the real property is sold, mortgaged, leased, exchanged, or is delivered to the distributees thereof, or until the estate is settled.

Unless sold, mortgaged, leased, or exchanged by the personal representative pursuant to other provisions of the Probate Code, the real property shall not be distributable by the personal representative.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

Cross References. Parties plaintiff and defendant, Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure 17.

Where defendant also served as a co-executrix of her mother's estate, subdivision (b)(2) of this section permitted her to preserve and maintain real property in the estate, but where the title to the real property vested in defendant immediately on her mother's death, the circuit court erred in approving any expenditures for the property made after the mother's death. Monk v. Griffin, 92 Ark. App. 320, 213 S.W.3d 651 (2005).

Where decedent's will devised her real property to her daughter so long as she outlived her brother, the property passed to decedent's daughter and vested in fee simple absolute; the property was not an asset in the hands of the estate representative for purposes of this section. Therefore, a receipt for assets of the estate signed by the family after decedent's death did not constitute a family settlement agreement which altered the terms of decedent's will.Butler v. Dike, 2009 Ark. App. 435, 320 S.W.3d 647 (2009).

Title to personal property of an intestate became vested in the personal representative when appointed and remained so vested until distribution upon proper order of the probate court; heirship was determined at the time of distribution. Dean v. Brown, 216 Ark. 761, 227 S.W.2d 623 (1950) (decision under prior law).

An administrator had no control of an intestate's lands, nor the rents thereof, when they were not needed for the payment of debts. Stewart v. Smiley, 46 Ark. 373 (1885); Hamilton Coal & Coke Co. v. Johns, 175 Ark. 1146, 1 S.W.2d 812 (1928); Mayo v. Bank, 188 Ark. 330, 65 S.W.2d 549 (1933) (preceding decisions under prior law).

An administrator was not entitled to possession of lands of which his intestate had only a naked legal title without substantial interest. Chowning v. Stanfield, 49 Ark. 87, 4 S.W. 276 (1886) (decision under prior law).

An administrator could not stand for or represent the heirs when the title to land was involved, nor was he entitled to the possession of lands unless they were needed to pay debt of the deceased. Jones v. Jones, 107 Ark. 402, 155 S.W. 117 (1913) (decision under prior law).

While lands were assets in the hands of an executor or administrator for purpose of payment of debts of estate, yet the title to the lands passed direct to the heirs upon death of an intestate subject only to right of administrator to have the lands sold if it was necessary for payment of the decedent's debts. Pfaff v. Heizman, 218 Ark. 201, 235 S.W.2d 551, 23 A.L.R.2d 957 (1951) (decision under prior law).

The provisions of this section were not designed to make an administrator automatically entitled to the real estate of a deceased intestate and did not change the rule that legal title to an intestate's land upon his death vests and descends to his heirs at law, subject to the widow's dower and the payment of debts through his administrator. Cranna v. Long, 225 Ark. 153, 279 S.W.2d 828 (1955).

Under this section, real property is an asset in the hands of an administrator only when a court finds that it should be sold, mortgaged, leased, or exchanged for purposes stated in §28-51-103. Keenan v. Peevy, 267 Ark. 218, 590 S.W.2d 259 (1979).

Only when real property has become an asset in an administrator's hands may he, in the language of this section, maintain or defend an action for the possession thereof, or to determine or protect the title thereto. Estate of Knott v. Jones, 14 Ark. App. 271, 687 S.W.2d 529 (1985).

By failing to challenge a land-sale agreement which involved the transfer of property by the decedent to the executrix's daughter less than 2 years before the decedent's death, the executrix did not completely discharge her duty to marshal all assets of the estate. Guess v. Going, 62 Ark. App. 19, 966 S.W.2d 930 (1998).

Where the estate of a deceased was, in the course of administration, with unpaid debts for which the land was liable, and physical possession of the land was in a person claiming under a deed of heirs at law of the decedent who filed a voluntary petition in bankruptcy more than four months before the probate court obtained jurisdiction, it was held that the bankruptcy court did not have jurisdiction to enjoin the probate court from selling the land for the debts of the estate. Bank of Hamburg v. Tri-State Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 69 F.2d 436 (8th Cir. 1934) (decision under prior law).

An administrator was entitled to the possession of any real estate of which his intestate died seized and could maintain ejectment against the heirs at law, except the widow or her tenant occupying the mansion and farm attached before the assignment of dower. Carnall v. Wilson, 21 Ark. (8 Barber) 62 (1860) (decision under prior law).

The legal title to an intestate's lands, upon his death, descended to and vested in his heirs at law, subject to the widow's dower and the payment of debts through his administrator. Except against the widow's dower, the administrator could, until the debts were all paid, enforce his right to the possession thereof by maintaining or defending an ejectment action. Culberhouse v. Shirey, 42 Ark. 25 (1883) (decision under prior law).

The lands of a decedent were assets in the hands of an executor or administrator and deemed in his possession and subject to his control for the payment of debts of the decedent; the administrator could maintain ejectment to recover possession of lands when necessary for the payment of the debts of the estate without joining the heirs in the suit. Burton v. Gorman, 125 Ark. 141, 188 S.W. 561 (1916) (decision under prior law).

Before a probate court could acquire jurisdiction to authorize an administrator to mortgage real property, a petition had to show that indebtedness to be paid from proceeds for the loan constituted a lien at the time the intestate died, unless the court order recited that independent evidence was presented showing a jurisdictional fact. Reed v. Futrall, 195 Ark. 1044, 115 S.W.2d 542 (1938) (decision under prior law).

Where an order was entered by the probate court which authorized the executor to borrow funds for purposes which fell within those permissible ones listed in §28-51-103, the mortgaged land became an asset in the hands of the executor and subject to the probate court's jurisdiction under subdivision (b)(1). Rowland v. Farm Credit Bank, 41 Ark. App. 79, 848 S.W.2d 433 (1993).

Where the court authorized the mortgaging of real estate which was an asset in the hands of the executor, for purposes which were not themselves authorized by statute, it did not serve to oust the court of jurisdiction or to render its order void and subject to collateral attack. Rowland v. Farm Credit Bank, 41 Ark. App. 79, 848 S.W.2d 433 (1993).

A foreign administrator could not sue for possession of intestate's lands in this state. Fairchild v. Hagel, 54 Ark. 61, 14 S.W. 1102 (1890) (decision under prior law).

In an administrator's suit to recover the royalty on coal lands of the intestate leased for five years to the defendant, in which it was claimed that the lease was void because the lands were not assets in the administrator's hands and could not be leased by the administrator without a court order, it was held that, since the defendant had possession of the land for three years under the lease and had paid royalties for two years, the relation of landlord and tenant was established and the lease was enforceable. Hamilton Coal & Coke Co. v. Johns, 175 Ark. 1146, 1 S.W.2d 812 (1928) (decision under prior law).

An administrator was without authority to execute a lease of lands which were in his hands only for the purpose of paying debts. Bingham v. Rhea, 201 Ark. 200, 143 S.W.2d 1087 (1940) (decision under prior law).

In an action by an administrator for the possession of lands claimed by his intestate, he could have his right to possession for the purpose of administration determined without the heirs being parties, inasmuch as such actions only affected the mere right to possession between the parties; however, when the title was affected, the heirs were necessary parties. Chowning v. Stanfield, 49 Ark. 87, 4 S.W. 276 (1886) (decision under prior law).

A personal representative who was timely substituted as the plaintiff in an estate's suit for an injunction had a property interest, giving her standing to sue as the real party in interest. White v. Welsh, 327 Ark. 465, 939 S.W.2d 299 (1997).

Judgment creditors were indispensable parties to a suit to enjoin the administrator from selling the real property of the estate for the payment of their judgments. Evans v. Gorman, 115 F. 399 (C.C.E.D. Ark. 1902) (decision under prior law).

A decedent's administrator was a necessary party to a suit for specific performance of an alleged oral contract whereby the decedent was to convey to the plaintiff all the decedent's real and personal property for the plaintiff's services where the administrator claimed the right of possession of the realty to pay the estate debts. Jensen v. Housley, 207 Ark. 742, 182 S.W.2d 758 (1944) (decision under prior law).

Where a decedent, prior to his death, became indebted on a note to the defendant and at the same time executed a deed to the defendant, a complaint by the administrator of decedent's estate which alleged that personal assets of the estate were insufficient to pay the debts of the estate and which further alleged that deed was a mortgage and that land was an asset of the estate subject to the mortgage of the defendant, asked that the court declare the deed a mortgage and that defendant be required to foreclose the mortgage, and requested that, upon sale, the surplus be turned over to the plaintiff as administrator stated a good cause of action. Tyler v. Morgan, 214 Ark. 667, 217 S.W.2d 606 (1949) (decision under prior law).

Allegation in suit by an administrator to recover personalty from defendants that defendants had received and converted personalty of deceased stated good cause of action under this section. Cranna v. Long, 225 Ark. 153, 279 S.W.2d 828 (1955).

Where there was no allegation that the property in question had ever become an asset in the hands of an administrator, the administrator was not entitled, under this section, to maintain an action to recover real property of decedent allegedly obtained by defendants by duress and undue influence on the decedent. Cranna v. Long, 225 Ark. 153, 279 S.W.2d 828 (1955).

Where the property of a decedent was sold by order of a chancery court, an administrator could not purchase at the sale. Reeder v. Meredith, 78 Ark. 111, 93 S.W. 558 (1906); Eagle v. Terrell, 95 Ark. 434, 130 S.W. 550 (1910) (preceding decisions under prior law).

A probate court has the authority to order and direct an administrator to bring suit for benefit of an estate to recover proceeds from the sale of land which a person has obtained from decedent by means of confidential relationship, duress, fraud, misrepresentation, and undue influence and while decedent was mentally incompetent. Health Betterment Found. v. Thomas, 225 Ark. 529, 283 S.W.2d 863 (1955).

Under this section, a probate court has jurisdiction to order an executor to collect a promissory note given for rent on devised lands and distribute the proceeds among the devisees. Pigue v. Grooms, 248 Ark. 262, 451 S.W.2d 181 (1970).

Under this section, an administrator is empowered to sue for and recover the personal property of the estate. Cranna v. Long, 225 Ark. 153, 279 S.W.2d 828 (1955).

Under the direction of the court, a personal representative has the right to maintain a suit, whether its object is to recover real estate or the proceeds derived from the sale of real estate, where it has been ascertained that the real property was wrongfully obtained from the decedent. Health Betterment Found. v. Thomas, 225 Ark. 529, 283 S.W.2d 863 (1955).

A widow in possession of the mansion of her late husband was entitled, in her own right, to collect the rents from the farm until dower was assigned her. Mobley v. Andrews, 55 Ark. 222, 17 S.W. 805 (1891) (decision under prior law).

An administrator was not entitled to recover rents on a building owned by his intestate where he neither alleged nor proved that the rents were needed to pay intestate's debts. Campbell v. Smith, 167 Ark. 633, 268 S.W. 359 (1925) (decision under prior law).

Where an administrator is not directed to take possession of realty under this section and the land is distributed to the heirs, it is not error for the court to order him to pay delay rental money received after closing the estate into the registry of the court where a partition suit involving the land is pending, although such order is made after the estate is closed and as part of an order denying a motion to set aside an order disallowing a claim against the estate. Boyd v. Matthews, 239 Ark. 112, 388 S.W.2d 102 (1965).

An heir at law would not acquire seizin of the lands of his ancestor so long as the lands remained in the possession of the administrator and there were outstanding debts. Tate v. Jay, 31 Ark. 576 (1876) (decision under prior law).

A probate court's authority to order a sale does not encompass the power to order a partition, which is preferably accomplished by a division in kind, and an application for a sale must be made only for certain purposes and by the personal representative, not by the widow. Gibson v. Gibson, 266 Ark. 622, 589 S.W.2d 1 (1979).

Real estate vests in the heirs of a decedent, subject to the widow's dower and to sale for the payment of debts, the preservation or protection of the assets of the estate, the distribution of the estate, or any other purpose in the best interest of the estate; the sale, however, is not necessarily free of the widow's dower, and such a sale is not void for want of jurisdiction, but is simply inoperative as far as the widow's dower is concerned. Keenan v. Peevy, 267 Ark. 218, 590 S.W.2d 259 (1979).

Intestate's title to realty, irrespective of the extent of her interest, at the moment of her death, vested in her heirs, subject to the payment of her debts; and intestate's administrator, in whom title to the property never did vest, could not maintain suit for partition of land in which intestate held a fractional interest. Calmese v. Weinstein, 234 Ark. 237, 351 S.W.2d 437 (1961).

Where an administrator held real estate in her possession as an asset of the estate, collected rents, paid taxes, and kept the property insured, it was error for a chancery court to entertain jurisdiction of a petition for partition filed by one of the heirs. Doss v. Taylor, 244 Ark. 252, 424 S.W.2d 541 (1968).

Where neither the allegation nor the proof established that possession of intestate's property or rents therefrom were needed to pay intestate's debts, the administrator had no right to maintain an action of unlawful detainer. Lockhart v. Roberts, 208 Ark. 569, 187 S.W.2d 183 (1945) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Boyd v. Bradley, 239 Ark. 120, 388 S.W.2d 107 (1965); Brickey v. Lacy, 247 Ark. 906, 448 S.W.2d 331 (1969); Price v. Price, 258 Ark. 363, 527 S.W.2d 322 (1975); Brown v. Kennedy Well Works, Inc., 302 Ark. 213, 788 S.W.2d 948 (1990); Graham v. State, 34 Ark. App. 126, 806 S.W.2d 32 (1991); Darr v. Bankston, 327 Ark. 723, 940 S.W.2d 481 (1997); Bullock v. Barnes, 366 Ark. 444, 236 S.W.3d 498 (2006).

Although a probate court had no power to attach property in probate proceedings where the widow appeared in open court and stipulated that she had assigned notes to the estate and agreed to turn them over to the administrator, this action gave the probate court jurisdiction to order that the notes be turned over. Hartman v. Hartman, 228 Ark. 692, 309 S.W.2d 737 (1958).

In a proceeding by the executor of an estate against a niece to determine ownership of bank account, where both parties agreed to submit their differences to the probate court, that court could take and retain jurisdiction. Park v. McClemens, 231 Ark. 983, 334 S.W.2d 709 (Ark. 1960).

A probate court had jurisdiction to determine ownership of money in banks where the administrator voluntarily submitted to its jurisdiction and first objected on appeal; if the appellant had not wanted to submit the issue to the probate court, an objection should have been made before a full scale trial was had, and then the appellant could have raised the question on appeal. Hobbs v. Collins, 234 Ark. 779, 354 S.W.2d 551 (1962).

Circuit court did not err by refusing to enforce the family-settlement agreement as requested; this section did not authorize the circuit court to force someone to give property to the decedent's estate simply because a person interested in the estate believed that it belonged to the decedent.Trask v. Trask, 2018 Ark. App. 400, 559 S.W.3d 277 (2018).

Where there were no minor children, an action by a deceased's widow as administrator to recover personal property belonging to the estate would bar a subsequent suit by the same plaintiff as the widow. Raymond v. Raymond, 134 Ark. 484, 204 S.W. 311 (1918) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Cranna v. Long, 225 Ark. 153, 279 S.W.2d 828 (1955); Snow v. Martensen, 255 Ark. 1049, 505 S.W.2d 20 (1974); Hall v. Superior Fed. Bank, 303 Ark. 125, 794 S.W.2d 611 (1990); Bullock v. Barnes, 366 Ark. 444, 236 S.W.3d 498 (2006).

Cross References. Compromise of claims against an estate, §28-50-112.

Ark. L. Rev.

Probate Code Amendments, 5 Ark. L. Rev. 377.

Panel on Settlement Procedures, 11 Ark. L. Rev. 54.

A personal representative has the authority to settle tort claims due an estate, and the probate court has authority to approve such settlements. Skaggs v. Cullipher, 57 Ark. App. 50, 941 S.W.2d 443 (1997).

A decedent's personal representatives could bring a breach of contract action against an attorney who allegedly failed to draft the decedent's will in accord with the decedent's desires. McDonald v. Pettus, 337 Ark. 265, 988 S.W.2d 9 (1999).

Acts 1848, § 1, p. 27, did not take away the common law power of an administrator to compromise a debt when a compromise was made pursuant to this section, as it relieved the administrator of the burden of proving that he acted judiciously. Wilks v. Slaughter, 49 Ark. 235, 4 S.W. 766 (1887); Wunderlich v. Bowen, 193 Ark. 284, 100 S.W.2d 80 (1936) (decisions under prior law).

An agreement where the administrator of the seller of two mules permitted the buyer to keep the mules until fall and then to pay for them was not a compromise under former statute. Lee v. Wagner, 185 Ark. 374, 47 S.W.2d 33 (1932) (decision under prior law).

This section was held inapplicable to the petition of a widow, as administrator, alleging that the estate was insufficient to satisfy the dower and statutory rights of the widow or to pay the expenses of administration and claims in full and seeking full distribution of assets in exchange for her payment of all claims and expenses, and an order granting the petition would be set aside where the notice required by §28-51-103, in relation to a petition for dower, was not given. Wilson v. Davis, 239 Ark. 305, 389 S.W.2d 442 (1965).

An administrator could compromise and accept settlement of an unliquidated claim for damages without special authority from a probate court. Treadway v. St. Louis, I.M. & S. Ry., 127 Ark. 211, 191 S.W. 930 (1917) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Baker v. State Farm Fire & Cas. Co., 34 Ark. App. 59, 805 S.W.2d 665 (1991); McGuire v. Smith, 58 Ark. App. 68, 946 S.W.2d 717 (1997).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 94; 1961, No. 424, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2401.

Parties.

28-49-102. Treatment of certain property as real or personal.

Unless foreclosure has been completed by the decedent and the redemption period has expired prior to his or her death, real property mortgages, the interest in the mortgaged premises conveyed thereby, and the debt secured thereby which come into the hands of the personal representative, or any real property acquired by the personal representative in settlement of a debt or liability, shall be deemed personalty in his or her hands and be distributed and accounted for as such. However, if the property is sold by the personal representative, it shall be sold as real property.

Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, in all cases of a sale of real property by a personal representative upon order of the court, the surplus of the proceeds of the sale remaining at the time of final settlement of the account shall be considered as real property and disposed of among the persons and in the same proportions as the real property would have been if it had not been sold.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 99; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2406.

28-49-103. Discovery of assets.

If a personal representative or other person interested in the estate files with the court an affidavit stating that the affiant has good cause to believe that any person named in the affidavit has knowledge concerning or possession of any real or personal property or of any records, papers, or documents belonging to the decedent, or which affect his or her title to or rights in any property, the court shall have the power to cause the person to appear before the court and be examined on oath for the discovery of the same.

Any person failing to appear when ordered or refusing to answer proper questions shall be adjudged guilty of contempt of court and punished accordingly.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 102; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2409.

28-49-104. Settlements.

When it appears to be for the best interest of the estate, or in the case of an action for wrongful death, for the best interest of the estate or widow and next of kin, the personal representative, upon the authorization of or approval by the court, may effect a compromise settlement of any claim, debt, or obligation due or owing to the estate, whether arising in contract or tort, or he or she may extend, renew, or in any manner modify the terms of any obligation owing to the estate.

If the personal representative holds a mortgage, pledge, or other lien upon property of another person, he or she may, in lieu of foreclosure, accept a conveyance or transfer of the encumbered assets from the owner thereof in satisfaction of the indebtedness secured by the lien, if it appears for the best interest of the estate and if the court shall so order.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 96; 1951, No. 255, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2403.

28-49-105. Recovery for property embezzled or converted.

If any person embezzles or converts to his or her own use any of the personal property of a decedent before the appointment of a personal representative, the person shall be liable to the estate for the value of the property so embezzled or converted. No person shall be charged as executor de son tort.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 101; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2408.

28-49-106. Abandonment of property.

When any property is valueless, or is so encumbered, or is in such condition that it is of no benefit to the estate, the court may order the personal representative to abandon it.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 100; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2407.

28-49-107. Property not paid for.

If a decedent has purchased any real or personal property and has neither completed the payments therefor, nor devised the property, nor provided by will for payment therefor, and the completion of the payments would be beneficial to the estate and not injurious to creditors, the personal representative, upon order of the court, may complete the payments out of assets in his or her hands, and the property shall be disposed of as other property of the estate.

If the court finds that completion of the payments would not be beneficial to the estate or would be injurious to the creditors, the court may order the personal representative to sell all of the right, title, interest, and claim of the decedent in and to the property.

Where there was evidence to indicate that an estate may have included equity in an automobile, since the decedent had purchased the property, the administrator should have proceeded to pay for it from the assets of the estate, sold it as provided in this section, obtained authority to abandon it as permitted under §28-49-106, or applied to the court for assignment of it to her as part of her statutory allowance under §28-39-101, as she was accountable for it, either by accounting under the Probate Code or for conversion under §28-49-105. Price v. Price, 253 Ark. 1124, 491 S.W.2d 793 (1973).

Where an estate was inadequate to complete payments on lands purchased by the decedent, the probate court could order the sale of the decedent's interest. Smith v. Pinnell, 107 Ark. 185, 154 S.W. 497 (1913) (decision under prior law).

After a wife elected to take against her husband's will, a trial court did not err in ruling that the husband's estate was responsible for remaining debt owed to a creditor because the debt was mainly used for the construction of chicken houses and, therefore, the estate would receive the major benefit of the loan.Combs v. Stewart, 374 Ark. 409, 288 S.W.3d 574 (2008).

A private sale made without authority from the court should not be confirmed. Gibbs v. Singfield, 115 Ark. 385, 171 S.W. 144 (1914) (decision under prior law).

Where a widow joined her husband in the execution of a mortgage of his land, she was entitled to dower therein, subject to the mortgage, but could not require the administrator to apply the personal estate to redeem the land. Hewitt v. Cox, 55 Ark. 225, 15 S.W. 1026 (1891) (decision under prior law).

A petition requesting the right to sell homestead of a minor to pay the debts of an estate, such sale to be subject to a mortgage thereon, conferred no jurisdiction on the probate court under former statute. Bank of Mulberry v. Frazier, 178 Ark. 28, 9 S.W.2d 793 (1928) (decision under prior law).

Ark. L. Rev.

Fraudulent Conveyances in Arkansas, 19 Ark. L. Rev. 149.

An administrator was not entitled to recover real property under this section where the complaint did not contain the allegation that defendants had obtained the property by fraud and undue influence upon the decedent. Cranna v. Long, 225 Ark. 153, 279 S.W.2d 828 (1955).

The Supreme Court of Arkansas has recognized certain indicia of fraudulent intent, including insolvency or indebtedness of the transferor, inadequate or fictitious consideration, retention of property by the debtor, the pendency or threat of litigation, secrecy or concealment, and the employment of unusual business practices; transfers to a debtor's family members are particularly suspect. United States v. Bryant, 15 F.3d 756 (8th Cir. 1994).

A couple's conveyance of substantially all their real and personal property to their children in trust, for nominal consideration, when litigation over substantial tax deficiencies and penalties was pending, exhibited all or virtually all of the indicia of fraud recognized in Arkansas; the claim by the father that he had a heart attack in 1985 and the conveyance was motivated by bona fide estate planning consideration was inadequate to avoid summary judgment in favor of the government under the well established principles of Arkansas fraudulent conveyance law. United States v. Bryant, 15 F.3d 756 (8th Cir. 1994).

Administratrix, wife of the decedent, who sought to divorce the decedent but reconciled shortly before the decedent's death, convinced the trial court the monies in a transfer-on-death account (TOD account), naming children from the decedent's former marriage as the beneficiaries, was a fraudulent transfer; if the TOD account was owned by both the decedent and the administratrix, the administratrix could claim dower rights in the property, but decedent's children presented compelling facts that the account was separate property owned by the decedent, and the trial court erred in granting summary judgment in favor of the administratrix. Ginsburg v. Ginsburg, 353 Ark. 816, 120 S.W.3d 567 (2003).

In creditor's action to set aside an alleged fraudulent conveyance arising from a transfer-on-death (TOD) beneficiary designation, the circuit court erroneously ruled that the probate court had exclusive jurisdiction and that the circuit court lacked jurisdiction; under Ark. Const. Amend. 80, § 6, and the fact that, under the Uniform Transfer on Death Security Registration Act, §28-14-101 et seq., the money transferred from the TOD account did not become part of the estate, the circuit court clearly had jurisdiction.Heritage Props. Ltd. P'ship v. Walt & Lee Keenihan Found., Inc., 2019 Ark. 371, 584 S.W.3d 685 (2019).

Where the administrator of an estate would not bring suit to set aside a fraudulent conveyance, it was proper for the widow to bring it and join the administrator as a defendant. Rush v. Smith, 239 Ark. 874, 394 S.W.2d 613 (1965).

Where an administrator was the fraudulent grantee of the decedent, her husband, she held the property in trust for the heirs at law, and the limitations did not begin to run against a suit by them for its recovery until she repudiated the trust. Bumpass v. McGehee, 247 F. 306 (8th Cir. 1917) (decision under prior law).

Where the executor of an alleged fraudulent grantor was the grantee and refused to bring a suit to set the deed aside, the heirs at law of the grantor had the right to bring it, making the executor a defendant. Moore v. Waldstein, 74 Ark. 273, 85 S.W. 416 (1905) (decision under prior law).

In creditor's action to set aside an alleged fraudulent conveyance arising from a transfer-on-death (TOD) beneficiary designation, the transferee's argument failed that the personal representative of the estate and not the creditor had standing for such an action; while there are procedures within the probate code that would allow for the challenge of an alleged fraudulent conveyance, section28-14-109(b) concerning TODs plainly allows creditors to pursue their claims against transferees under other Arkansas laws, and thus a creditor also may pursue its claim under the Fraudulent Transfers Act, §4-59-201 et seq.Heritage Props. Ltd. P'ship v. Walt & Lee Keenihan Found., Inc., 2019 Ark. 371, 584 S.W.3d 685 (2019) (decided under pre-2017 version of §4-59-201 et seq.).

Although a deceased executed a deed with the intent to defraud his creditors, the deed did not take effect until delivery and when it was not delivered until a subsequent time, when there were no creditors of the deceased who could suffer by the transfer, the deed was not void. Deniston v. Phillips, 121 Ark. 550, 181 S.W. 911 (1916) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Dereuisseaux v. Bell, 238 Ark. 60, 378 S.W.2d 208 (1964).

The filing of inventory shall not be required if all of the distributees who are competent and the legally appointed, qualified, and acting guardians of the estates of all those incompetent have filed written waiver of inventory, unless the court finds a need for filing the inventory.

However, if any person asserts a claim against the estate or claims an interest therein and makes written demand for the filing of an inventory, it shall be filed unless it is shown to the court that the alleged claim is invalid or has been paid or that the person alleging such an interest in the estate has, in fact, no interest therein.

Inventories may be introduced in evidence but shall not be conclusive for or against the personal representative or any person interested in the estate. Other evidence may be admitted to vary the effect thereof.

Where a will provided for the appointment of a widow as the executor without giving bond and without making reports and settlements, a remainderman in the estate had no right to require a bond and an accounting from the widow, who was a life tenant, without alleging and proving mismanagement, waste, or conversion. Dillen v. Fancher, 197 Ark. 995, 125 S.W.2d 110 (1939) (decision under prior law).

Since this section requires the filing of an inventory in a prescribed form and §§28-52-103 and28-52-104 also set out requirements as to form and time of accounting, the fact that an administrator filed a “first and final report” purporting to furnish full information with respect to everything pertaining to the estate was not compliance in the manner and form required by these sections. Price v. Price, 253 Ark. 1124, 491 S.W.2d 793 (1973).

An inventory was inadequate where the personal representative failed to attach an affidavit as required by subsection (a). Eddins v. Style Optics, Inc., 71 Ark. App. 102, 35 S.W.3d 315 (2000).

A probate court has jurisdiction to direct the executor of an estate to collect and distribute the proceeds from a rental note if the granting of a petition would be for the best interest of the estate and the devisees. Pigue v. Grooms, 248 Ark. 262, 451 S.W.2d 181 (1970).

A probate court erred in refusing to take jurisdiction of an executor's petition asking that he be directed to collect rent note for land which the testator had left to five separate devisees where the devisees were scattered geographically, the tenant would naturally demand the surrender of the note when he paid it, and devisees were unable to agree upon the distribution of the proceeds. Pigue v. Grooms, 248 Ark. 262, 451 S.W.2d 181 (1970).

Where the heirs did not perfect an appeal from a judgment of a circuit court reversing a judgment of a probate court requiring an executor to make an inventory and file accounts in a proceeding instituted by them, they could not relitigate the same question in a subsequent proceeding instituted by the probate clerk by which the heirs became parties on their own motion. Parker v. Williams, 172 Ark. 699, 290 S.W. 67 (1927) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 97; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2404.

28-49-108. Mortgaged property.

If a decedent has mortgaged any real or personal property, or has pledged any personal property, or at the time of his or her death owns an equity of redemption, and he or she has neither devised the property nor provided by will for the redemption thereof, the court may order the personal representative to redeem the property out of assets in his or her hands if the action would be beneficial to the estate and not injurious to creditors.

If redemption would be injurious to the estate or to the creditors, the court may order the personal representative to sell all of the right, title, and interest of the decedent in and to the property.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 98; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2405.

28-49-109. Fraudulent conveyances.

A personal representative of a grantor who has fraudulently conveyed or transferred any interest in real or personal property with intent to delay his or her creditors in the collection of their just demands may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction to have the conveyance or transfer set aside and cancelled and to recover the property, or the value thereof, for the use and benefit of all persons having an interest in the estate of the fraudulent grantor.

No property so conveyed or transferred shall be taken from, nor shall any recovery be had from, any person who acquired any legal interest therein for a valuable consideration in good faith and without notice.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 95; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2402.

Parties to Action.

28-49-110. Inventories.

(1)Except as provided in this section, within two (2) months after his or her qualification or as the court may direct, a personal representative shall file a true and complete inventory of all property owned by the decedent at the time of his or her death, except such interests as terminated by reason of his or her death, describing each item of property in detail and setting out the personal representative's appraisement of the fair market value of the property as of the date of the death of the decedent.

The personal representative shall append to the inventory his or her affidavit to the effect that the inventory is complete and accurate to the best of his or her knowledge and belief and that the personal representative was not indebted or obligated to the deceased at the time of his or her death except as stated in the inventory.

Errors or omissions in an inventory shall be corrected by supplemental inventory or the next accounting of the personal representative or as the court may direct.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, §§ 91, 92; 1973, No. 39, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-2301, 62-2302.